Utah statutes.
63C-9-402.   Executive director -- Duties.
The executive director shall:
(1)  develop, for board approval, a master plan with a projection of at least
20 years concerning the stewardship responsibilities, operation, activities,
maintenance, preservation, restoration, and modification of the capitol hill
complex, capitol hill facilities, and capitol hill grounds, including, if
directed by the board, a plan to restore the buildings to their original
architecture;
(2)  develop, as part of the master plan submitted for board approval, a
furnishings plan for the placement and care of objects under the care of the
board;
(3)  prepare, and recommend for board approval, an annual budget and work
plan, that is consistent with the master plan, for all work to be performed
under this chapter, including usual operations and maintenance and janitorial
and preventative maintenance for the capitol hill complex, capitol hill
facilities, capitol hill grounds, and their contents;
(4)  develop an operations, maintenance, and janitorial program for the
capitol hill complex, capitol hill facilities, capitol hill grounds, and their
contents;
(5)  develop a program to purchase or accept by donation, permanent loan, or
outside funding items necessary to implement the master plan;
(6)  develop and maintain a registration system and inventory of the contents
of the capitol hill facilities and capitol hill grounds and of the original
documents relating to the buildings' construction and alteration;
(7)  develop a program to purchase or accept by donation, permanent loan, or
outside funding items of historical significance that were at one time in the
capitol hill facilities and that are not owned by the state;
(8)  develop a program to locate and acquire state-owned items of historical
significance that were at one time in the buildings;
(9)  develop a collections policy regarding the items of historic significance
as identified in the registration system and inventory for the approval of the
board;
(10)  assist in matters dealing with the preservation of historic materials;
(11)  make recommendations on conservation needs and make arrangements to
contract for conservation services for objects of significance;
(12)  make recommendations for the transfer or loan of objects of significance
as detailed in the approved collections policy;
(13)  make recommendations to transfer, sell, or otherwise dispose of unused
surplus property that is not of significance as defined in the collections
policy and by the registration system;
(14)  approve all art and exhibits placed on capitol hill after board
approval;
(15)  employ staff to assist him in administering this chapter and direct and
coordinate their activities;
(16)  contract for professional services of qualified consultants, including
architectural historians, landscape architects with experience in landscape
architectural preservation, conservators, historians, historic architects,
engineers, artists, exhibit designers, and craftsmen;
(17)  prepare annually a complete and detailed written report for the board
that accounts for all funds received and disbursed by the board during the
preceding fiscal year;
(18)  develop and manage a visitor services program for capitol hill which
shall include public outreach programs, public tours, events, a gift shop, and
communication and public relation services; and
(19)  manage and organize all transit and parking programs on the capitol hill
complex, except that:
(a)  the Legislative Management Committee shall direct the executive
director's management and organization of transit and parking associated with
the legislative area as defined in Section 36-5-1; and
(b)  the governor shall direct the executive director's management and
organization of transit and parking associated with the governor's area as
defined in Section 67-1-16.
